Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
PART 7
LARGE-MARKET TAXICAB SERVICES

40-10.1-701. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

Nothing in this part 7 requires or prohibits a motor carrier applying for a permit pursuant to section 40-10.1-702 (1)(a) to form a labor union nor requires any large-market taxicab service driver to join a labor union; and

If a motor carrier previously obtained a certificate of public convenience and necessity to provide taxicab service pursuant to section 40-10.1-201 and the certificate remains valid at a time that the motor carrier subsequently obtains a permit to operate large-market taxicab service under this part 7, the motor carrier's certificate constitutes a devalued asset for the motor carrier.

Source: L. 2018:

Entire part added, (HB 18-1320), ch. 363, p. 2167, § 10, effective August 8.

40-10.1-702. Large-market taxicab service - permit required - rules.

On and after January 1, 2019, a person shall not operate or offer to operate large-market taxicab service in intrastate commerce without first having obtained a permit to operate large-market taxicab service from the commission in accordance with this part 7.

A person may apply for a permit in a form and manner prescribed by the commission.

A permit issued pursuant to this section is valid for one year after the date of issuance.

Except as provided in section 40-10.1-704, the commission shall issue a permit to a motor carrier of passengers upon completion of the application filed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the payment of a fee determined by the commission, compliance with the financial responsibility requirements established by rule by the commission pursuant to section 40-10.1-107, and submission of current rate information pursuant to section 40-10.1-705.

In order to obtain a permit under this section, an applicant must demonstrate that each vehicle operated under the permit has been inspected within the immediately preceding twelve months by a qualified mechanic in accordance with rules promulgated by the commission.

Except as provided in subsection (4)(b) of this section, a motor carrier providing large-market taxicab service must have at least twenty-five vehicles in its fleet at all times.

In El Paso, Larimer, and Weld counties, a motor carrier providing large-market taxicab service must have at least ten vehicles in its fleet at all times.

For each county served by a motor carrier providing large-market taxicab service pursuant to this part 7, the commission shall by rule determine the maximum rate that a motor carrier providing large-market taxicab service may charge its passengers.

Source: L. 2018:

Entire part added, (HB 18-1320), ch. 363, p. 2168, § 10, effective August 8.

40-10.1-703. Large-market taxicab service license plates - rules.

The commission shall create either a document or an electronic system that a person authorized to provide large-market taxicab service under this part 7 may use to verify to the department of revenue or the department's authorized agent that the person provides large-market taxicab service.

Upon request, the commission shall:

If the commission creates a document pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, provide the document to the person authorized to provide large-market taxicab service; or

If the commission creates an electronic system pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, provide the electronic verification to the department of revenue or its authorized agent.

The commission may promulgate rules to implement this section and to enforce section 42-3-236.

Source: L. 2018:

Entire part added, (HB 18-1320), ch. 363, p. 2168, § 10, effective August 8.

40-10.1-704. Permit revocation.

If a motor carrier that holds a permit under this part 7 fails to comply with a final commission decision that assesses a fine or civil penalty pursuant to section 40-7-113 for a violation of this article 10.1 or a rule adopted pursuant to this article 10.1, the motor carrier's permit is revoked immediately. Any of the following persons are disqualified from applying for a permit for twenty-four months after the date of the permit revocation:

The motor carrier;

An owner, principal, officer, member, partner, or director of the motor carrier; and

Any other entity owned or operated by an owner, principal, officer, member, partner, or director of the motor carrier.

The disqualification set forth in subsection (1) of this section does not apply to revocation based on a failure to carry insurance unless the person knowingly operated the motor carrier without insurance.

The disqualification set forth in subsection (1) of this section is in addition to and not in lieu of any other penalty or disqualification, including the period of disqualification specified in section 40-10.1-112 (4).

Source: L. 2018:

Entire part added, (HB 18-1320), ch. 363, p. 2169, § 10, effective August 8.

40-10.1-705. Rates - limitations - rules.

Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, large-market taxicab services are not subject to rate limitations imposed under part 2 of this article 10.1.

A motor carrier operating a large-market taxicab service shall file with the commission, in the form and manner that the commission may designate, a schedule showing the rates, charges, and collections that the motor carrier collects, enforces, or intends to collect or enforce that affect or relate to the motor carrier's large-market taxicab service operations.

The commission shall not limit the number or frequency of rate schedules that a motor carrier may file with the commission pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section.

Unless a filed rate schedule exceeds the maximum rate set by the commission by rule pursuant to section 40-10.1-702 (5), the commission shall not reject a rate schedule filed with the commission unless the schedule was not filed in the form and manner designated by the commission pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section. The commission shall not amend any rate schedule filed with the commission pursuant to this section.

It is unlawful for a motor carrier operating a large-market taxicab service to carry or advertise that it will carry individuals in a manner contrary to the filing required under subsection (2)(a) of this section.

The commission may promulgate rules consistent with this section to implement the system of schedule filings required by this section.

Source: L. 2018:

Entire part added, (HB 18-1320), ch. 363, p. 2169, § 10, effective August 8.